New Jersey, session 222, A2646.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2018, c.53, there is appropriated out of the General Fund the following sum for the purpose specified: 78 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 60 Transportation Programs 61 State and Local Highway Facilities DIRECT STATE SERVICES 06-6100 Maintenance and Operations .............................................. $10,000,000 Total Capital Construction Appropriation, $10,000,000 State and Local Highway Facilities ................................. Capital Construction: Route 208 Highway Guard Rail Installation ... ($10,000,000) Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the Commissioner of Transportation shall be exempt from the Department of Transportations 2015 Roadway Design Manual guidelines concerning the installation of highway guard rail in this State for the purposes of this appropriation. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.